Washington statutes.
RCW 40.07.020

Definitions.

The terms defined in this section shall have the meanings indicated when used in this chapter.

(1) "Director" means the director of financial management.

(2) "State agency" includes every state office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, committee, higher education institution, community college, and agency of the state and all subordinate subdivisions of such agencies in the executive branch financed in whole or in part from funds held in the state treasury, but does not include the offices of executive officials elected on a statewide basis, agricultural commodity commissions, the legislature, the judiciary, or agencies of the legislative or judicial branches of state government.

(3)(a) "State publication" means publications of state agencies and shall include any annual and biennial reports, any special report required by law, state agency newsletters, periodicals and magazines, and other printed informational material intended for general dissemination to the public or to the legislature.

(b) "State publication" may include such other state agency printed informational material as the director may prescribe by rule or regulation, in the interest of economy and efficiency, after consultation with the governor, the state librarian, and any state agencies affected.

(c) "State publication" does not include:

(i) Business forms, preliminary draft reports, working papers, or copies of testimony and related exhibit material prepared solely for purposes of a presentation to a committee of the state legislature;

(ii) Typewritten correspondence and interoffice memoranda, and staff memoranda and similar material prepared exclusively as testimony or exhibits in any proceeding in the courts of this state, the United States, or before any administrative entity;

(iii) Any notices of intention to adopt rules under RCW 34.05.320;

(iv) Publications relating to a multistate program financed by more than one state or by federal funds or private subscriptions; or

(v) News releases sent exclusively to the news media.

(4) "Print" includes all forms of reproducing multiple copies with the exception of typewritten correspondence and interoffice memoranda.

[ 1989 c 175 s 86; 1979 c 151 s 50; 1977 ex.s. c 232 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.